Utah statutes.
63C-4-108.   Communication with other states and governmental entities.

(1)  The Federalism Subcommittee chair may correspond with the presiding officer of the legislative branch of another state or an entity of another state that has powers and duties that are similar to the Federalism Subcommittee to discuss and coordinate the evaluation of and response to federal law as provided in Section 63C-4-106.

(2)  The Federalism Subcommittee shall send a copy of this bill and the pages of the House and Senate Journal that pertain to Laws of Utah 2011, Chapter 252 to:

(a)  the governor of each state;

(b)  the presiding officer, the majority leader, and the minority leader of each house, if applicable, of each state legislature;

(c)  each United States Senator or Representative elected from this state;

(d)  the Chief Justice of the United States Supreme Court;

(e)  the President of the United States; and

(f)  the presiding officer, the majority leader, and the minority leader of each house of the United States Congress.

